Arkansas, session 2025, HB1253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 13, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 19 — Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate
Compact

20-13-1901. Text of compact.
The Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact
is enacted into law and entered into by this state with all states legally
joining therein and in the form substantially as follows:

RECOGNITION OF EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL LICENSURE INTERSTATE
COMPACT (“REPLICA”)

EMS PERSONNEL LICENSURE INTERSTATE COMPACT

SECTION 1. PURPOSE
*JMB028*
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253

In order to protect the public through verification of competency and ensure
accountability for patient care related activities all states license
emergency medical services (EMS) personnel, such as emergency medical
technicians (EMTs), advanced EMTs and paramedics. This Compact is intended to
facilitate the day to day movement of EMS personnel across state boundaries
in the performance of their EMS duties as assigned by an appropriate
authority and authorize state EMS offices to afford immediate legal
recognition to EMS personnel licensed in a member state. This Compact
recognizes that states have a vested interest in protecting the public’s
health and safety through their licensing and regulation of EMS personnel and
that such state regulation shared among the member states will best protect
public health and safety. This Compact is designed to achieve the following
purposes and objectives:
1. Increase public access to EMS personnel;
2. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and
safety, especially patient safety;
3. Encourage the cooperation of member states in the areas of EMS
personnel licensure and regulation;
4. Support licensing of military members who are separating from an
active duty tour and their spouses;
5. Facilitate the exchange of information between member states
regarding EMS personnel licensure, adverse action and significant
investigatory information;
6. Promote compliance with the laws governing EMS personnel practice
in each member state; and
7. Invest all member states with the authority to hold EMS personnel
accountable through the mutual recognition of member state licenses.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS

In this compact:
A. “Advanced Emergency Medical Technician (AEMT)” means: an
individual licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that
corresponds to that level in the National EMS Education Standards and
National EMS Scope of Practice Model.
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
B. “Adverse Action” means: any administrative, civil, equitable or
criminal action permitted by a state’s laws which may be imposed against
licensed EMS personnel by a state EMS authority or state court, including,
but not limited to, actions against an individual’s license such as
revocation, suspension, probation, consent agreement, monitoring or other
limitation or encumbrance on the individual’s practice, letters of reprimand
or admonition, fines, criminal convictions and state court judgments
enforcing adverse actions by the state EMS authority.
C. “Alternative program” means: a voluntary, non-disciplinary
substance abuse recovery program approved by a state EMS authority.
D. “Certification” means: the successful verification of entry-level
cognitive and psychomotor competency using a reliable, validated, and legally
defensible examination.
E. “Commission” means: the national administrative body of which all
states that have enacted the compact are members.
F. “Emergency Medical Technician (EMT)” means: an individual licensed
with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that
level in the National EMS Education Standards and National EMS Scope of
Practice Model.
G. “Home State” means: a member state where an individual is licensed
to practice emergency medical services.
H. “License” means: the authorization by a state for an individual to
practice as an EMT, AEMT, paramedic, or a level in between EMT and paramedic.
I. “Medical Director” means: a physician licensed in a member state
who is accountable for the care delivered by EMS personnel.
J. “Member State” means: a state that has enacted this compact.
K. “Privilege to Practice” means: an individual’s authority to
deliver emergency medical services in remote states as authorized under this
compact.
L. “Paramedic” means: an individual licensed with cognitive knowledge
and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the National EMS
Education Standards and National EMS Scope of Practice Model.
M. “Remote State” means: a member state in which an individual is not
licensed.
N. “Restricted” means: the outcome of an adverse action that limits a
license or the privilege to practice.
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
O. “Rule” means: a written statement by the interstate Commission
promulgated pursuant to Section 12 of this compact that is of general
applicability; implements, interprets, or prescribes a policy or provision of
the compact; or is an organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of
the Commission and has the force and effect of statutory law in a member
state and includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule.
P. “Scope of Practice” means: defined parameters of various duties or
services that may be provided by an individual with specific credentials.
Whether regulated by rule, statute, or court decision, it tends to represent
the limits of services an individual may perform.
Q. “Significant Investigatory Information” means:
1. .investigative information that a state EMS authority, after
a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity to
respond if required by state law, has reason to believe, if proved true,
would result in the imposition of an adverse action on a license or privilege
to practice; or
2. investigative information that indicates that the individual
represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of
whether the individual has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
R. “State” means: means any state, commonwealth, district, or
territory of the United States.
S. “State EMS Authority” means: the board, office, or other agency
with the legislative mandate to license EMS personnel.

SECTION 3. HOME STATE LICENSURE

A. Any member state in which an individual holds a current license
shall be deemed a home state for purposes of this compact.
B. Any member state may require an individual to obtain and retain a
license to be authorized to practice in the member state under circumstances
not authorized by the privilege to practice under the terms of this compact.
C. A home state’s license authorizes an individual to practice in a
remote state under the privilege to practice only if the home state:
1. Currently requires the use of the National Registry of
Emergency Medical Technicians (NREMT) examination as a condition of issuing
initial licenses at the EMT and paramedic levels;
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
2. Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about individuals;
3. Notifies the Commission, in compliance with the terms herein,
of any adverse action or significant investigatory information regarding an
individual;
4. No later than five years after activation of the Compact,
requires a criminal background check of all applicants for initial licensure,
including the use of the results of fingerprint or other biometric data
checks compliant with the requirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation
with the exception of federal employees who have suitability determination in
accordance with US CFR §731.202 and submit documentation of such as
promulgated in the rules of the Commission; and
5. Complies with the rules of the Commission.

SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE

A. Member states shall recognize the privilege to practice of an
individual licensed in another member state that is in conformance with
Section 3.
B. To exercise the privilege to practice under the terms and
provisions of this compact, an individual must:
1. Be at least 18 years of age;
2. Possess a current unrestricted license in a member state as
an EMT, AEMT, paramedic, or state recognized and licensed level with a scope
of practice and authority between EMT and paramedic; and
3. Practice under the supervision of a medical director.
C. An individual providing patient care in a remote state under the
privilege to practice shall function within the scope of practice authorized
by the home state unless and until modified by an appropriate authority in
the remote state as may be defined in the rules of the commission.
D. Except as provided in Section 4 subsection C, an individual
practicing in a remote state will be subject to the remote state’s authority
and laws. A remote state may, in accordance with due process and that state’s
laws, restrict, suspend, or revoke an individual’s privilege to practice in
the remote state and may take any other necessary actions to protect the
health and safety of its citizens. If a remote state takes action it shall
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
promptly notify the home state and the Commission.
E. If an individual’s license in any home state is restricted or
suspended, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in a remote state
under the privilege to practice until the individual’s home state license is
restored.
F. If an individual’s privilege to practice in any remote state is
restricted, suspended, or revoked the individual shall not be eligible to
practice in any remote state until the individual’s privilege to practice is
restored.

SECTION 5. CONDITIONS OF PRACTICE IN A REMOTE STATE

An individual may practice in a remote state under a privilege to practice
only in the performance of the individual’s EMS duties as assigned by an
appropriate authority, as defined in the rules of the Commission, and under
the following circumstances:
1. The individual originates a patient transport in a home state and
transports the patient to a remote state;
2. The individual originates in the home state and enters a remote
state to pick up a patient and provide care and transport of the patient to
the home state;
3. The individual enters a remote state to provide patient care and/or
transport within that remote state;
4. The individual enters a remote state to pick up a patient and
provide care and transport to a third member state;
5. Other conditions as determined by rules promulgated by the
commission.

SECTION 6. RELATIONSHIP TO EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE COMPACT

Upon a member state’s governor’s declaration of a state of emergency or
disaster that activates the Emergency Management Assistance Compact (EMAC),
all relevant terms and provisions of EMAC shall apply and to the extent any
terms or provisions of this Compact conflicts with EMAC, the terms of EMAC
shall prevail with respect to any individual practicing in the remote state
in response to such declaration.
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253

SECTION 7. VETERANS, SERVICE MEMBERS SEPARATING FROM ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY,
AND THEIR SPOUSES

A. Member states shall consider a veteran, active military service
member, and member of the National Guard and Reserves separating from an
active duty tour, and a spouse thereof, who holds a current valid and
unrestricted NREMT certification at or above the level of the state license
being sought as satisfying the minimum training and examination requirements
for such licensure.
B. Member states shall expedite the processing of licensure
applications submitted by veterans, active military service members, and
members of the National Guard and Reserves separating from an active duty
tour, and their spouses.
C. All individuals functioning with a privilege to practice under this
Section remain subject to the Adverse Actions provisions of Section VIII.

SECTION 8. ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. A home state shall have exclusive power to impose adverse action
against an individual’s license issued by the home state.
B. If an individual’s license in any home state is restricted or
suspended, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in a remote state
under the privilege to practice until the individual’s home state license is
restored.
1. All home state adverse action orders shall include a
statement that the individual’s compact privileges are inactive. The order
may allow the individual to practice in remote states with prior written
authorization from both the home state and remote state’s EMS authority.
2. An individual currently subject to adverse action in the home
state shall not practice in any remote state without prior written
authorization from both the home state and remote state’s EMS authority.
C. A member state shall report adverse actions and any occurrences
that the individual’s compact privileges are restricted, suspended, or
revoked to the Commission in accordance with the rules of the Commission.
D. A remote state may take adverse action on an individual’s privilege
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
to practice within that state.
E. Any member state may take adverse action against an individual’s
privilege to practice in that state based on the factual findings of another
member state, so long as each state follows its own procedures for imposing
such adverse action.
F. A home state’s EMS authority shall investigate and take appropriate
action with respect to reported conduct in a remote state as it would if such
conduct had occurred within the home state. In such cases, the home state’s
law shall control in determining the appropriate adverse action.
G. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state’s decision
that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse
action and that such participation shall remain non-public if required by the
member state’s laws. Member states must require individuals who enter any
alternative programs to agree not to practice in any other member state
during the term of the alternative program without prior authorization from
such other member state.

SECTION 9. ADDITIONAL POWERS INVESTED IN A MEMBER STATE’S EMS AUTHORITY

A member state’s EMS authority, in addition to any other powers granted under
state law, is authorized under this compact to:
1. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence.
Subpoenas issued by a member state’s EMS authority for the attendance and
testimony of witnesses, and/or the production of evidence from another member
state, shall be enforced in the remote state by any court of competent
jurisdiction, according to that court’s practice and procedure in considering
subpoenas issued in its own proceedings. The issuing state EMS authority
shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required
by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses and/or evidence are
located; and
2. Issue cease and desist orders to restrict, suspend, or revoke an
individual’s privilege to practice in the state.

SECTION 10. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR EMS PERSONNEL
PRACTICE
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253

A. The Compact states hereby create and establish a joint public
agency known as the Interstate Commission for EMS Personnel Practice.
1. The Commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of
the Compact states.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate. The responsible official of the state EMS authority or his designee
shall be the delegate to this Compact for each member state. Any delegate
may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state
from which the delegate is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the
Commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the member state in
which the vacancy exists. In the event that more than one board, office, or
other agency with the legislative mandate to license EMS personnel at and
above the level of EMT exists, the Governor of the state will determine which
entity will be responsible for assigning the delegate.
2. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote with regard
to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have
an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the Commission.
A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the
bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’ participation in meetings by
telephone or other means of communication.
3. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice
of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the
rulemaking provisions in Section XII.
5. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting if
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
the Commission must discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations
under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel practices and
procedures;
c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of
goods, services, or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigatory
reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other
committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of
compliance issues pursuant to the compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or member state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to
this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall certify that
the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting
provision. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description
of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action
shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the
Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
C. The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the delegates,
prescribe bylaws and/or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or
appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of the compact,
including but not limited to:
1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:
a. for the establishment and meetings of other committees;
and
b. governing any general or specific delegation of any
authority or function of the Commission;
3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting
meetings of the Commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all
meetings, and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by
interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the
public’s interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information,
including trade secrets. The Commission may meet in closed session only after
a majority of the membership votes to close a meeting in whole or in part. As
soon as practicable, the Commission must make public a copy of the vote to
close the meeting revealing the vote of each member with no proxy votes
allowed;
4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority, and reasonable
procedures for the election of the officers of the Commission;
5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the
establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the Commission.
Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any member state,
the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of
the Commission;
6. Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible and
prohibited activities of Commission members and employees;
7. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the
Commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist
after the termination of the Compact after the payment and/or reserving of
all of its debts and obligations;
8. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and file a copy
thereof, and a copy of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or
officer in each of the member states, if any.
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
9. The Commission shall maintain its financial records in
accordance with the bylaws.
10. The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are
consistent with the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws.
D. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. The authority to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and
coordinate implementation and administration of this Compact. The rules shall
have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all member states;
2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any state EMS authority
or other regulatory body responsible for EMS personnel licensure to sue or be
sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
4. To borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a member state;
5. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to
carry out the purposes of the compact, and to establish the Commission’s
personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
6. To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize
and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Commission shall
strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;
7. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of,
or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal or
mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall strive to avoid any
appearance of impropriety;
8. To sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon,
or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
9. To establish a budget and make expenditures;
10. To borrow money;
11. To appoint committees, including advisory committees
comprised of members, state regulators, state legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested
persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws;
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
12. To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
13. To adopt and use an official seal; and
14. To perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent with the state
regulation of EMS personnel licensure and practice.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
from each member state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of
the operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which must be
in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year
for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual
assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by
the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior
to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the
authority of the member state.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts
and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.
However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report
of the Commission.
F. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability,
either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to
or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or
that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed
to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for any damage, loss,
injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee or representative of the Commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties,
or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall
be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel;
and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did
not result from that person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the Commission
for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.

SECTION 11. COORDINATED DATABASE

A. The Commission shall provide for the development and maintenance of
a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse
action, and significant investigatory information on all licensed individuals
in member states.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a
member state shall submit a uniform data set to the coordinated database on
all individuals to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Significant investigatory information;
4. Adverse actions against an individual’s license;
5. An indicator that an individual’s privilege to practice is
restricted, suspended or revoked;
6. Non-confidential information related to alternative program
participation;
7. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial; and
8. Other information that may facilitate the administration of
this Compact, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
C. The coordinated database administrator shall promptly notify all
member states of any adverse action taken against, or significant
investigative information on, any individual in a member state.
D. Member states contributing information to the coordinated database
may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing state.
E. Any information submitted to the coordinated database that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member state
contributing the information shall be removed from the coordinated database.

SECTION 12. RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this Section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules
and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or
amendment.
B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a
rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to
adopt the Compact, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in
any member state.
C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or
special meeting of the Commission.
D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
Commission, and at least sixty (60) days in advance of the meeting at which
the rule will be considered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a
Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission; and
2. On the website of each member state EMS authority or the
publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.
E. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in which
the rule will be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for
the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any
interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to
the Commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any
written comments.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow
persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall
be made available to the public.
G. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing
before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by:
1. At least twenty-five (25) persons;
2. A governmental subdivision or agency; or
3. An association having at least twenty-five (25) members.
H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the
Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the scheduled public
hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify
the executive director of the Commission or other designated member in
writing of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than
five (5) business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person
who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or
in writing.
3. No transcript of the hearing is required, unless a written
request for a transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
transcript shall bear the cost of producing the transcript. A recording may
be made in lieu of a transcript under the same terms and conditions as a
transcript. This subsection shall not preclude the Commission from making a
transcript or recording of the hearing if it so chooses.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of
the Commission at hearings required by this section.
I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business
on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the Commission
shall consider all written and oral comments received.
J. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final
action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the
rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
K. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by
interested parties is received, the Commission may proceed with promulgation
of the proposed rule without a public hearing.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for
comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided
in the Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule
as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative
rule that is established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of
correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the
website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be
challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to
a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the chair of
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision
is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Commission.

SECTION 13. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight
1. The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state
government in each member state shall enforce this compact and take all
actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact’s purposes and
intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules promulgated hereunder
shall have standing as statutory law.
2. All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the
rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state
pertaining to the subject matter of this compact which may affect the powers,
responsibilities or actions of the Commission.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in such
a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the
Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this
Compact, or promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a member state has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under
this compact or the promulgated rules, the Commission shall:
a. Provide written notice to the defaulting state and
other member states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of
curing the default and/or any other action to be taken by the Commission; and
b. Provide remedial training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the
defaulting state may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote
of a majority of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits
conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of
termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed
only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice
of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s
legislature, and each of the member states.
4. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date
of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date
of termination.
5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state
that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact,
unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting
state.
6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission
by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices. The
prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt
to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and
between member and non-member states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion,
shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in
the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the Commission has its principal offices against a member
state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and
its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of
the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under
federal or state law.

SECTION 14. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR EMS
PERSONNEL PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT

A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact
statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. The provisions, which
become effective at that time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the
Commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter,
the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the
implementation and administration of the compact.
B. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the Commission’s
initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on
the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has
been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and
effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.
C. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six
(6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing state’s EMS authority to comply with the investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective date
of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any EMS personnel licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a member state and a non-member state that does not
conflict with the provisions of this compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until
it is enacted into the laws of all member states.

SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes
thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any
state member thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to
the remaining member states. Nothing in this compact supersedes state law or
rules related to licensure of EMS agencies.

20-13-1902. Administration of compact — Rules.
(a) The Department of Health is the Emergency Medical Services
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact administrator in this state.
(b) The department may adopt rules consistent with the compact that
are necessary to implement this subchapter.
(c) The department is not required to adopt the rules of the
Interstate Commission for EMS Personnel Practice for those rules to be
effective in this state.
(d) For the purposes of the member state's ability to reject a rule
under Section 12(B) of the Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure
Interstate Compact, Arkansas delegates its authority in this provision to the
General Assembly or the Legislative Council.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1102 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1102. Mandatory criminal history checks for emergency medical
services personnel.
(a)(1) Any applicant applying for initial licensure shall complete a
criminal history check form and shall request the Identification Bureau of
the Division of Arkansas State Police to conduct a state or and national
criminal history check, or both, on the applicant.
(2) The applicant shall pay all appropriate fees for the state
or and national criminal history check, or both, as set forth by the bureau.
(3) The applicant shall attach the criminal history check form
to the Arkansas emergency medical services personnel licensure application.
(b) The Division of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of
Health shall conduct a state or and national criminal history check, or both,
on the applicant and determine whether the applicant is disqualified from
licensure based on the report of the applicant's criminal history and forward
its determination to the applicant directly.

03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-13-1104 is amended to read as follows:
20-13-1104. Form — State and national criminal history check.
(a) A request for a state or and national criminal history check, or
both, on a person shall include a completed form as required by the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police and by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(b) If an applicant is requesting initial Arkansas emergency medical
services personnel licensure and can provide proof of continuous residency in
the State of Arkansas for the past five (5) years, then the applicant shall
be required to have only a state criminal history check completed.
(c) If an applicant is requesting initial Arkansas emergency medical
services personnel licensure and is from another state or if the applicant
cannot provide proof of continuous residency in the State of Arkansas for the
past five (5) years, the applicant shall be required to have both a state and
a national criminal history check completed.
(b) The criminal history check shall conform to the applicable federal
standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.
(c) Upon completion of the criminal history check, the Identification
Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall forward to the
Department of Health all releasable information obtained concerning the
applicant.
(d)(1) Any information received by the department from the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police under this
section shall not be available for examination except by:
(A) The affected applicant for licensure or his or her
authorized representative; or
(B) The person whose license is subject to revocation or
his or her authorized representative.
(2) A record, file, or document shall not be removed from the
custody of the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State
Police.
(e) Any information made available to the affected applicant for
licensure or the person whose license is subject to revocation shall be
information pertaining to that person only.
(f) Rights of privilege and confidentiality established in this
section shall not extend to a document created for purposes other than the
03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H3/3/25 HB1253
criminal history check.
(g) The department shall adopt the necessary rules to implement this
section.
(h)(1) The department may participate at the state and federal level
in programs that provide notification of an arrest subsequent to an initial
criminal history check that is conducted through available governmental
systems.
(2) The department may submit an applicant's fingerprints to the
federal Next Generation Identification system.
(3) The fingerprints may be searched against future submissions
to the federal Next Generation Identification system, including latent
fingerprint searches.
(4) An applicant enrolled in the federal Next Generation
Identification system is not required to re-fingerprint when a subsequent
request for a state or federal criminal history check is required if:
(A) A legible set of the applicant's fingerprints is
obtained when the applicant enrolls in the federal Next Generation
Identification system; and
(B) The applicant is subject to the Rap Back service of
the federal Next Generation Identification system.
(i) The Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police
and the Federal Bureau of Investigation may maintain fingerprints in the
Integrated Automated Fingerprint Identification System.

/s/L. Johnson











03-03-2025 10:28:20 JMB028